Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.135

Certification of bargaining representative—Cross-check.

If only one employee organization is seeking certification as exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the commission may determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the employer. A determination through a cross-check process may be made upon a showing of interest submitted in support of the exclusive bargaining representative by more than fifty percent of the employees. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2019 c 230 s 16.]